Georgia, session 2025_26, HB857.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating the State Court of Cobb County, approved March 26, 1964
(Ga. L. 1964, p. 3211), as amended, particularly by an Act approved May 3, 2023
(Ga. L. 2023, p. 4333), is amended by revising paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of Section 17
as follows:
"(4) The salary of the chief deputy clerk shall be $135,000.00 to be paid in equal monthly
installments from funds of Cobb County."
SECTION 2.
Said Act is further amended by revising Section 23 as follows:
H. B. 857
- 1 -

LC 62 0201
"SECTION 23.
The clerk of the State Court of Cobb County shall receive an annual salary of $150,000.00
payable in equal monthly installments from the funds of Cobb County."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 857
- 2 -